Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-50] Notice to the department of land
and natural resources of suspensions and revocations of operating privileges.
The director shall notify the department of land and natural resources of all
persons adjudicated of violations under this part and the period of suspension
or revocation of operator privileges ordered by the director under this part.
[L 2001, c 157, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next